Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201244-8503
Vendor; limited lines insurance license;
issuance; application; contents.

(1) A vendor shall hold a limited lines insurance license
issued under the Portable Electronics Insurance Act to sell or offer coverage
under a policy of portable electronics insurance.

(2) The director
may issue a limited lines insurance license under the act. Such license shall
authorize an employee or authorized representative of a vendor to sell or
offer coverage under a policy of portable electronics insurance to a customer
at each location at which the vendor engages in a portable electronics transaction.

(3) The vendor
shall submit an application for a limited lines insurance license pursuant
to section 44-8504 to the director, and a list of all locations in this state
at which the vendor intends to offer such insurance coverage shall accompany
the application. A vendor shall maintain such list and make it available for
the director upon request.

(4) Notwithstanding any other provision
of law, a limited lines insurance license issued under the act shall authorize
the vendor and its employees or authorized representatives to engage in the
activities permitted by the act.

Laws 2011, LB535, § 3.